Illinois, session 104th, HB672.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Decennial Committees on Local Government 5Efficiency Act is amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (50 ILCS 70/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Decennial Committees on Local Government Efficiency Act.9(Source: P.A. 102-1088, eff. 6-10-22.)